Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
Number of Reviews
24

Author
John Beachem
Directed by: Wolfgang Petersen
Written by: Sebastian Junger (book), William D. Wittliff
In the Fall of 1991, the Andrea Gail left Gloucester, Mass. and headed for 
the fishing grounds of the North Atlantic. Two weeks later, an event took 
place that had never occurred in recorded history. That's the tagline for 
Wolfgang Petersen's ("Air Force One") "The Perfect Storm", and it pretty 
well sums up the film's entire plot. All we really have are George Clooney 
playing the Captain of the Andrea Gail, Billy Tyne; and Mark Whalberg 
("Three Kings") playing his second in command, Billy Shatford, sitting on a 
boat getting tossed around by a hurricane. This is generally all that 
happens throughout the film. Oh sure, there's a little side story about a 
coast guard crew and a family trapped on a sail boat, and we get the 
occasional glimpses of the crew of the Andrea Gail's families back home. Yet 
all the movie really involves is watching six men stumble around on the deck 
of a small fishing ship. When I first heard about this film I thought that 
sounded like a ten minute movie stretched out to no more than an hour and a 
half, right? Wrong, Petersen and Wittliff ("Legends of the Fall") manage to 
drag this bloody movie out for more than two excruciating hours!
I'll grant it, "The Perfect Storm" does succeed admirably on one level. It 
tests your abilities to both sustain disbelief and endure sappy melodrama 
like few films have before. As for the suspension of disbelief, that I could 
handle (afterall, I watched "Battlefield: Earth", now nothing can compare). 
This is despite the fact that we are required to believe a man could climb 
up the side of a ship while in the middle of the worst hurricane in recorded 
history. Now I'll admit, I don't know much about boats. In fact I despise 
the things and wild horses couldn't drag me onto one. However, I'm pretty 
sure when the wind is strong enough to make waves two to three hundred feet 
high it's going to knock you around a bit more than it does the Andrea 
Gail's crew. As for enduring the sappy melodrama, that I couldn't do. I'm 
sure when this really happened emotions ran high for some time both during 
and after the event, but I doubt people were running around screaming cheesy 
speeches while VERY dramatic music constantly played around them. Of course 
I could be wrong.
I can forgive a lot in a bad movie if the acting is exceptional, but it's 
certainly sub-par in "The Perfect Storm". George Clooney doesn't even act 
like George Clooney (like he usually does). He acts like a man doing a bad 
impersonation of George Clooney. As though his regular acting wasn't bad 
enough, just wait till you see him get mad. I've never actually seen him act 
really angry in a movie before, and now I see why he's never been asked to; 
it's hilarious. Mark Whalberg, who "acted" alongside Clooney in the equally 
terrible "Three Kings" last year, seems to have improved some since then, 
but given some of the horrifying dialogue he's given it's sometimes hard to 
tell. The rest of the cast amounts to little more than cameos. We get the 
always good Michael Ironside ("Total Recall") as Clooney's evil, money 
grubbing boss (is there another kind in Hollywood?); and the usually 
adequate Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio ("The Abyss") as Clooney's love 
interest of sorts. The only other person worth noting is William Fichtner 
("Drowning Mona"), that poor man's Christopher Walken himself, as the crew's 
requisite slacker who redeems himself at some point in the story.
So, you're probably asking yourself, is there anything good about this 
movie? Sure, the special effects are quite good. Anything else? I'm afraid 
not. Fear not, because there's plenty more that's so laughably bad you might 
almost enjoy the film as a result. The dialogue is so painfully bad I 
actually covered my ears at one point. We get lines like: "One more trip out 
there and the Andrea Gail will own you! Like it owns Billy Tyne!". Ouch, or 
how about: "Fish will gather again for the Andrea Gail." If this was a 
parody that would actually be funny. I'm not sure who should be blamed for 
the film's overly dramatic score, James Horner for composing it or Wolfgang 
Petersen for using it in every scene, dramatic or not. I think certain 
scenes near the film's beginning were intended to show how joyous and fun 
fishing for a living can be. If that was the intent it failed, because 
fishing for a living still looks dull and monotonous, just like the film. 
I'd recommend "The Perfect Storm" to those with nautical minds, because 
they'll probably get something more out of it than I did, and to those who 
for some reason enjoy heart tugging, sentimental movies. I give the movie 
two out of five stars. Oh, and did I mention the special effects? They're 
ever so impressive.
Comments? Send to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
Past reviews can be found at:
http://www.all-reviews.com/reviewers/JohnBeachem.htm,
http://www.epinions.com/user-elerad?public=yes or 
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?John+Beachem
* * * * * - One of the best movies of the year.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it at your own risk.
* - See this one only if you enjoy pain.

Author
David N. Butterworth
        It begins with big, bland titles and the cloying strains of James
Horner's obsequious score starting up, a simple refrain repeated so often
it gnaws its way into your cranium like a coprophagous beetle digging for
dung.  Yuk.
        Next we're introduced to our cast of characters, a predictable
weather-beaten lot with handles like Murph and Bugsy and Sully.  The
stubborn, macho swordboat captain (George Clooney); the inexperienced young
punk (Mark Wahlberg); the burly divorcee (John C. Reilly); the token
African American (Allen Payne); the troublemaker (Michael Fichtner); the
scruffy one who smells like fish and can't get a woman to even look at him
(John Hawkes).
        It's not that we're simply introduced to these stereotypes,
however.  We have the intimate details of their personal lives thrust down
our throats within the film's first fifteen minutes.  I mean this happens
*very* quickly.  Why are the filmmakers in such a rush to fob us off with
these hokey, trite, and laughable scenes?  So that we'll care about these
people as individuals once we get to the storm stuff, of course.
Ironically, the latest coming attractions for "The Perfect Storm" now
position the film as a personal human drama rather than a rousing
action-adventure flick.  Interesting.
        Anyway, for the next interminable two hours we get the story.  The
true story.  But what story?  Six idiots lost at sea--*that's* the story.
That's all there is.  Gloucesterman Billy Tyne (Clooney) is having a run of
bad luck and vows to take his Andrea Gail out for one last (and hopefully
big) haul to make his quota.  "I catch fish.  It's what I do" he sneers at
his pit boss ("Starship Troopers"' Michael Ironside).  Billy's ragtag band
of fishermen all need the money so they're happy to ragtag along, at least
initially.  Wahlberg shares a tender moment with his lovely thirtysomething
girlfriend (played by Diane Lane) before he heads out beyond the Grand
Banks.  "Last night I dreamed that you are I were so close I couldn't tell
where I ended and you began."  Or something like that.  I tell you the
dialogue in this film must have been written by a three-year-old (although
screenwriter Bill Wittliff appears to be considerably older than that).
Anemic and foolish, the on-screen patter makes you want to spit.
        The promotions people would have us believe that "In the Fall of
1991, an event took place that had never occurred in recorded history" but
the meteorological intrigues of the plot are reduced to having a Boston
weatherman (played by a bespectacled Christopher McDonald, Adam Sandler's
golf opponent in "Happy Gilmore") "ooh!" and "aah!" at advancing weather
patterns on his computer screen.  As he traces the swirling masses on the
monitor with his finger he comments to himself "This is unheard of.
Hurricane Grace kicking up a fuss down here, a system rising off Sable
Island there, and the Gulf Stream pushing forth a cold front over here.  If
these three were to collide it would be a disaster of epic proportions.
It'd be the storm of the century.  No wait, it'd be--dot dot dot--The
Perfect Storm."  Or something like that.  I haven't seen a decent film yet
in which a character speaks the film's title, often times to camera.  I
still haven't.
        Once the winds whip up it's like the wreck of the Hesperus out
there, with the film piling on the "suspense" by regularly flashing
subtitles at the bottom of the screen. "Mistral (Plymouth, NH), 345 Miles
Off Bermuda."  "HMS Hermes--Halfway to Havana."  "Meteorological Tracking
Station U-571, Baffin Bay."  And "The Flemish Cap" moments after Cap'n
Billy announces they are steering towards The Flemish Cap, a remote section
of sea that's barely on the map.
        These reference points come so thick and fast it's as if the
filmmakers expect us to have a lapful of nautical charts and are plotting
the rough weather's course every step of the way.  Another way the film
creates "drama" is to have two of the crew members constantly battling with
each other.  The minute Reilly and Fichtner's characters are introduced
they start bickering, trading barbs and insults--"your mother was a
lobsterman!"--without explanation.  Why?  Because there's no other dramatic
tension.  Except for a sloop with Karen Allen aboard being buffeted around
with another testosterone-driven male at the helm.  "I don't use charts, I
just go with my gut.  Let's ride this one out," says Dad.  Or something
like that.  Who are these people and what are they doing here?  The men in
this film give their gender a really bad rap; it's hard to care about
morons.
        But the women don't do any better.  A bunch of them sit around the
bar at the Crow's Nest in Gloucester, Maine chewing their fingernails and
watching the devastation being wreaked on the television.  Lane's brow is
constantly furrowed.  And Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, who seems to have
modeled her rival skipper character on Clint Eastwood, what with her
growled delivery and gnarly, barnacled appearance, provides two
embarrassingly heart-wrenching soliloquies, the first of which goes
something like this.  (On the radio to Billy): "Oh my God Billy, it's
happening!  You have to get out of there now.  It's the mother of all
storms.  It's a huge epic of unfathomable proportions.  It's the devil
itself.  You're headed right into the eye of a monster!"  Or something like
that (cut to two hours of our actors having buckets of water dumped over
their heads).  If anyone had drawn a gun in this film the trigger would
have jammed.
        It wasn't until a rescue helicopter flew over the choppy North
Atlantic that I was reminded that Wolfgang Petersen's last film was that
mega-turkey, "Air Force One."
        "Lost at sea."  "Petersen has missed das boot here."  "This one
stinks of fish"  "Rough waters."  "Waves of emotion."  "Perfectly
horrible."  "The Perfect Mess."  There are so many ways to describe "The
Perfect Storm" but "a satisfying movie-going experience" just isn't one of
them.  Disastrous?  Yes.  An epic of tragic proportions?  Sure.  A tragedy
of epic proportions?  Absolutely.  I can think of only three good things in
the film: the Big Waves (courtesy Industrial Light and Magic), how expertly
the cast handles tackle and bait, and Reilly's knit cap.  Otherwise it's a
bust.
        Had I not been obligated to ride it out I would have stormed out of
this one at the quarter hour mark.  It would have been the right decision.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Author
Homer Yen
The fishermen of Gloucester, Massachusetts live their
lives to fish.  As the film opens, we see this
pastoral harbor community with statues honoring brave
seamen, shipbuilders hard at work creating new
vessels, and a large number of fishing boats
triumphantly returning with their catch.  Gloucester
fishermen are more committed to fishing than to their
marriages.   They are courageous superheroes when they
are out on the open seas.  And, to catch their fish,
they are even willing to brave the perfect storm.
"The Perfect Storm" is an absorbing yarn about man
versus nature and the folly that results from blind
hubris.  Based on Sebastian Junger's nonfiction
bestseller, the film is a vivid retelling of a
devastating 1991 incident in which a down-on-his-luck,
swordfish boat captain risks it all to bring back a
catch that promises to make them a huge profit.  Led
by skipper Billy Tyne (stoic George Clooney) who
captains the Andrea Gail, he hopes that this next trip
out to the fishing grounds of the Grand Banks (a few
days east of Gloucester) will lift him out of his
current slump. 
But going out to sea is like an extended and dangerous
tour of duty.  The crewmembers' loved ones rejoice
when their men return home.  But faces are filled with
sorrow when it's time to leave.  For Captain Tyne,
fishing has resulted in a broken marriage.  For the
youthful and wildly-in-love Bobby (Mark Wahlberg), it
means having to spend time away from his girlfriend. 
And for crewmember Murphy (John C. Reilly), it means
being separated from his lovable son.  Other crewmates
are also hesitant to go back out.  Tyne coldly stares
at them and threatens, "if any of you don't want to
come, a replacement is just a phone call away."  You
may think that he's unrealistically overbearing, but
as a local hatchery manager says, "that's the way the
game is played."  
The seas are a dangerous place in the fall, having the
potential to swallow ships whole.  "The Grand Banks is
no joke in October," warns one concerned Gloucester
resident.  By now, we've developed a genuine liking
for the crew of the Andrea Gail, as well as an immense
respect for their work ethic.  But we get the
foreboding sensation that this trip will be marred
with peril.
The Andrea Gail encounters all kinds of bad luck. 
Though they eventually catch lots of fish, a monster
storm takes them by surprise.  The local forecaster
says, "you can be a meteorologist all your life and
never see this."  It's a storm so ferocious that it
creates maximum gale force winds and 10-story swells. 
In fact, you can barely hear the actors even when they
are yelling at each other through the wind-whipped
rain.  Special effects convincingly and impressively
create the furious, churning seas.  And the camera
shots, which show the crew rocking back and forth,
convey such realism that at times it was a
queasiness-inducing experience.  The film also shows
other craft caught and victimized by the angry seas. 
Freighters are having its cargo knocked off its decks
by the enormous waves while even the Coast Guard has
been rendered almost powerless.  Captain Tyne remains
unfazed.  He must travel through the storm in order to
sell his fish, lest his catch spoil.  He is a
determined man who opens the throttle against the
unstoppable forces of pride and Mother Nature.
Engaging characters make for a watchable film, and the
entire ensemble cast performs admirably.  We share the
concern of the loved ones as they watch the
increasingly dire weather reports.  We feel their
sense of helplessness.  We pray for the fearless
skipper to find a way to maneuver through the crashing
waves, howling winds, and torrential downpour.  The
love that we develop for the crew and those that
eagerly await their return pulls us in.  But
ultimately it may be the storm that pulls them under. 

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Wolfgang Petersen.
Cast: George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, John C. Reilly, John Hawkes, William 
Fichtner, Diane Lane, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, Rusty Schwimmer, Allen 
Payne, Karen Allen, Bob Gunton, Cherry Jones, Dash Mihok, Christopher 
McDonald, Janet Wright, Josh Hopkins, Michael Ironside.
2000 - 129 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity, violence, and intensity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, July 1, 2000.
Wolfgang Petersen's "The Perfect Storm," is a slam-bang, pulse-pounding 
action thriller that has the clear distinction of creating the most realistic 
and horrifying storm ever put to celluloid. This is appropriate, of course, 
since it is based upon the worst storm in recorded history that fell upon the 
New England border in October 1991, when three weather patterns (a cold 
front, a low-pressure system, and a hurricane) collided. With the awesome 
technology of Industrial Light & Magic, Petersen has crafted a technical 
masterpiece that puts you dead-center in the storm, surrounded by visual 
effects that never once call attention to themselves, and are always nothing 
less than believable. 
The humans involved in the catastrophe hold no such scrutiny, but they are 
adequately developed enough that we care about them when their lives become 
in peril. The film focuses on the plight of the Andrea Gail, a boat holding a 
crew of fisherman from Gloucester, Mass., who have set out on the open seas 
for one last attempt to earn some extra money by catching swordfish. When 
skipper Billy Tyne (George Clooney) decides to travel to the faraway Flemish 
Cap for one last round of fishing, despite the warnings of friendly rival 
Linda Greenlaw (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio) that they will have no way of 
getting back without passing through the storm, Billy's pride and ego get the 
best of him. With the agreement of the other men on board, including Bobby 
Shatford (Mark Wahlberg), whose loving girlfriend, Christina (Diane Lane), 
waits nervously on land, they opt to ride out the storm rather than let all 
of the fish they have caught spoil. What they don't know, since their radio 
has gone out, is the full force of the storm, and that they are heading right 
for the eye of it.
Accurately capturing each side of the storm, and the people involved in it, 
there are also four subplots at hand: the dilemma of the search and rescue 
helicopter team; the plight of the Mistral, a yacht headed for Bermuda that 
is carrying three passengers (Karen Allen, Bob Gunton, Cherry Jones); the 
Andrea Gail's friends and family, who nailbitingly await any news on their 
rescue; and the meteorologist (Christopher McDonald) who first coined the 
phrase, "The Perfect Storm," because every weather pattern was in place to 
create a storm of disastrous proportions.
Based on the book of the same name by Sebastian Junger, "The Perfect Storm" 
is an edge-of-your-seat thrill ride that is one step above most disaster 
pictures of its type because of the reality that is brought to it, both from 
a visual standpoint, as well as in its portrayal of the working-class 
characters. While not all are developed satisfactorily, particularly the 
three passengers on the Mistral, as well as suave, ladies' man Andrea Gail 
traveler Alfred Pierre (Allen Payne), they all are on hand to create a dark 
atmosphere and brooding sense of dread that hangs over the proceedings. 
As head of the Andrea Gail, George Clooney is well-cast as the no-nonsense 
Billy Tyne, whose love of fishing outweighs all other things, including the 
possibility of death. Their second film in a row together (the other being 
1999's "Three Kings"), Mark Wahlberg equips himself nicely as Bobby Shatford, 
a young man who tells Billy at one point, "I have a girl that I can't stand 
to be away from for more than ten minutes. But then again, I love to fish." 
Bobby has agreed for Christina to do away with his somewhat dangerous 
profession after this one last trip, and the conflicting feelings that he 
feels is made palpable, due to Wahlberg's strong performance. 
Rounding out the large cast is the always-good Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, 
as Linda Greenlaw; Diane Lane, as Christina; John C. Reilly, heartfelt and 
likable as Andrea Gail fisherman Dale Murphy, who is having problems handling 
not being able to see his young son as much since he separated from his wife; 
William Fichtner as bad-tempered Sully; and John Hawkes as the lonely Bugsy. 
As Irene, a straight-talking, yet sweet, single mother whom Bugsy strikes up 
a potential relationship with before he sets off on the Andrea Gale, Rusty 
Schwimmer is a charismatic, natural standout, and steals each of her scenes.
All human actors, however, play second banana to the star attraction of the 
picture, which is the robust, life-threatening storm itself, complete with 
downpouring rain, violent lightning, and, in a startlingly frightening 
climactic moment, a 100-foot tidal wave. The special effects supervisors at 
ILM have done a striking job bringing the storm to life, in all its horrific 
glory, and it is because of them that most warrants seeing it on the big 
screen.
"The Perfect Storm" isn't a great motion picture. There are too many loose 
story threads and one too many artificial and cliched lines of dialogue for 
such a title. The picture also, perhaps, takes just a little too much time 
getting to the storm, and fleetingly tests the patience. Once it gets going, 
though, it never lets up. As a purely visceral experience, "The Perfect 
Storm" is an electrifying powerhouse, undoubtedly the most exciting and 
rewarding action-thriller of the summer.

Author
Mark O'Hara
It's been  few days since I've seen Wolfgang Petersen's THE PERFECT STORM, 
and I don't like it as well as I did while I watched it.
I don't usually take this much time to percolate, to ponder over a film, 
before reviewing it.
Here's what I still think is very good:  The images of the hurricane itself, 
foreshadowed from early in the narrative, and climaxing at the end, are 
marvelous.  Much of this footage is computer generated, the waves as tall as 
buildings dwarfing the rather large swordfishing boat.  Often it is easy to 
pick out computerized work, especially when it involves water (think of the 
fake-y scenes in DEEP BLUE SEA),  but here the ocean appears real and 
threatening, a truly awesome natural force.  As the crew of the `Andrea 
Gail' valiantly fight to batten the windows and buck the waves, we 
understand somewhat the futility they must feel.
The acting is for the most part very strong.  I have always liked George 
Clooney, even though I thought he acted too much with those smiley eyes of 
his;  but in several scenes in STORM, Clooney seals the performance so far 
of his career.  He plays Captain Billy Tyne, who has brought his crew out on 
an extra fishing run, a result of a poor run from which they have just 
returned.  Tyne is a complicated man;  Clooney plays him as quiet yet 
fiercely proud and competitive.  When his crew suggests the `Andrea Gail' 
turn about, Tyne reveals his plans to venture even farther, halfway across 
the Atlantic even, to the `Finnish Cap,' where the real fish are.  This plot 
twist leads to the main conflict.  Will the men on the boat be able to 
navigate their way back home through the storm that has been ravaging the 
coast?  Where Clooney comes in is the scene in which Billy Tyne exerts his 
will over the crew.  It is a mixture of pep talk and threatening lecture, 
and Clooney's eyes are narrowed and dead serious.  Clooney proves himself a 
leading man, even more clearly than in another strong performance, in THREE 
KINGS.
We see good work from the supporting cast as well.  Mark Wahlberg is 
convincing as Bobby Shatford, who has cut bait and pack ships before, but 
who is a rookie in the actual fishing game.  The story follows his 
relationship with Christina Cotter (Diane Lane); this subplot serves as the 
romantic interest, as Tyne is divorced and living far from his family.  As 
`Murph,' John C. Reilly is always reliable, even though we don't know the 
full history of his hatred for another crew member, `Sully,' played by 
William Fichtner (remember him, the kooky SEAL from THE ABYSS, as well as 
the kooky astronaut from ARMAGEDDON?).  John Hawkes also plays an 
interesting, though sketchily developed character, in Michael `Bugsy' Moran.
What I think, upon second thought, is weak:  Petersen and screenwriter 
William D. Wittliff (from the non-fiction book by Sebastian Junger) work too 
hard at trying to build up the combination of cold fronts and hurricane that 
births this perfect natural disaster.  We watch rather disconnected scenes 
at a television news set in Boston, the meteorologist following the storm 
readouts as though he's witnessing the chance of his career.  There's no 
connection between this subplot and the main characters, and there is only a 
tenuous connection to a small craft, piloted by a rich man (Bob Gunton, the 
kooky warden in THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION), and carrying two female 
passengers.  About to be swamped by the storm, the three are rescued at 
great risk by the crew of a Coast Guard chopper.  While the three shaken 
victims wait aboard the Guard cutter, the crew leave on another mission, to 
try and rescue the men of the `Andrea Gail.'
Actually, some of the scenes involving the trouble experienced by the 
chopper crew are some of the best in the film.  This suggests to me, though, 
that we need stronger connections between all of the subplots:  Petersen 
needs to work on his connectors.
My other major complaint concerns the ending.  Without spoiling it with 
specific revelations, I judge the closing now as too sentimental.  Perhaps 
one or even two scenes at the very end could be cut  then we would not have 
to sit through a couple of moments that try but fail to earn our tears.  It 
seems as though the director simply refused to end with the outcome of the 
sea story, and had to return to the women who waited faithfully on land.
So, the sea story works well on its own, the men battling each other and 
then the storm.  This microcosmic representation of the world is 
particularly interesting, as it calls up the madness of some scenes in 
Mellville's  MOBY DICK, the quintessential American novel.  What I'm 
thinking of is the pattern of bad omens that convinces the crew the voyage 
is doomed.  However, when the other subplots surface occasionally  the 
weatherman and the rich, bad sailor and the worried women back at home  
they give thin support to the main story.
On the whole, THE PERFECT STORM offers very solid summer entertainment, with 
some of the most gripping hurricane shots on film.  With a few reservations, 
I would recommend watching the film  particularly for the performances of 
Clooney, Wahlberg and Lane. But you may wish to wait for the video.


Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie wallpapers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
"Money shots". I have to admit that I have always been a sucker for money
shots in movie trailers. Who can forget the tidal wave scene from DEEP
IMPACT a couple of years ago, or just recently, the shot of Catherine
Zeta-Jones slinking under a red laser with her butt sticking up in the air
for ENTRAPMENT. Money shots are those very scenes in a movie trailer that
make us want to see the film in question. This year, the top money shot for
me was the gigantic son-of-a-bitch wave featured for this film. What a shot!
What a wave! Here's my nine dollars and change...now let's see the movie!
PLOT:
Based on a true story, written about in a novel, this movie features an
atmospheric anomaly known as the perfect storm and the six men who happened
to get caught right in the middle of it while going out to catch some fish.
CRITIQUE:
This movie starts off slow, wanders into its own at about the halfway point
and gets really, really wet and wild after that! Are you one of those people
who is prone to seasickness? Well, if you are, I wouldn't suggest that you
see this movie, cause it really does make you feel like you're part of the
ride during its second half. Boats capsizing left and right, crewmembers
scrambling all over the deck, water crunching down on the little ship as it
keeps pushing itself further into the monster storm from hell! This movie
sure beat the crap out of my senses as it moved through the psychotic gale,
but I have to admit that it all did seem a little redundant after a while.
Okay, so here's yet another shot of George and Marky Mark guarding the fort
at the helm of the ship. And here's even more water splashing all over them.
Hmmm....okay! But don't mind my sarcasm too much, I did thoroughly enjoy the
second half of this film. It was tense, it was fast, it was furious,
godammit I'll say it...it was a whole barrel of monkey fun! And that's the
kind of thing that I look for in a summer action popcorn presentation.
Slap together a few interesting actors with decent skills. Set up an
engaging tale, and blow me away with a lot of cool effects and plenty of
action. Check, check and check! I would've preferred that the sentimental
crap at the beginning of the film was chopped of a wee bit. I would've
preferred that the lovely Diane Lane, whom I honestly do love, remembered to
brush up on her acting skills before her breakdown scenes. And I definitely
would've preferred that the whole side-story about the helicopter dudes
jumping into the water, was replaced by a rescue attempt by another ship, or
just more focus on the Andrea Gail, but then again, I'm just a dinky
audience member with a sharp opinion. Overall, I can't say that I didn't
enjoy the film. It provided me with just the right amount of mindless
entertainment that I needed over this hot, sticky, summer holiday weekend. I
was also very glad to see the return of the money shot from the film's
trailer, a shot which is definitely atop my list of most amazing things I've
seen on the big screen this year. What a scene! Add William Fichtner into
the mix, little screen time for Mastrantonio, and just enough character
development for me to give a rat's ass about most of the crew members, and I
thank Wolfgang for slapping together another decent nail-biter. Thank you,
my good man...I think I'm gonna go throw up now! (but in a good way)

Author
Laura Clifford
In 1991, the swordfish boat Andrea Gail left Gloucester, Massachusetts in
October, late in the season, because its captain, Billy Tyne (George Clooney)
wanted to prove he could still find the fish.  He pushed his boat farther 
into the Atlantic than most boats normally ventured mid-season.  
Meanwhile, Hurricane Grace, which had been dying off the coast of Bermuda, met 
up with an old frontal system from New England and a new one coming out of the 
Great Lakes, rejuvenating itself into one perfect storm right in the Andrea 
Gail's pathway home.
Wolfgang Petersen, director of the below-water submarine classic "Das Boot,"
creates the surface maelstrom of Sebastian Junger's bestseller from a 
screenplay adaptation by William D. Wittliff.
The film begins on location in Gloucester, where the Andrea Gail's disappointed
crew receive less than their expected wages, even as they're thrilled to
be reunited with friends and family at The Crow's Nest, the local watering hole
presided over by Ethel Shatford (Janet Wright, TV's "More Tales of the City," 
"Ladies and Gentlemen, the Fabulous Stains" (with Diane Lane)).  Her son,
rookie fisherman Bobby Shatford (Mark Wahlberg, "Three Kings") only wants to 
stay in the game to make the quick cash needed to regain custody of his 
girlfriend Christina's (Diane Lane, "My Dog Skip") children, even though she 
begs him to take a safer, albeit less lucrative job.  When Tyne decides to
head out one more time, Shatford signs up as does old salt Murph (John C. 
Reilly, "Magnolia"), who's paying child support to a wife he still loves but 
lost over his seafaring absences.  Bugsy (John Hawkes (I), "Blue Streak) is
attempting to begin a new relationship with Irene (Rusty Schwimmer, "Amistad")
the night before they sail, while Alfred Pierre (Allen Payne, "A Price Above
Rubies") kisses goodbye the blonde he just kissed hello.  Tyne also
recruits new crew member Sully (William Fichtner, "Go") which doesn't go 
down well with Murph because the man once had an affair with his ex-wife.
The trip seems jinxed from the outset as the swordfish supply dries up and
Bobby has a run-in with a shark that's hauled aboard.  Murphy gets hauled
overboard and under when he's hooked by a line (ironically it's Sully who
dives in first to save him) and a rogue wave challenges the whole crew.
Then Tyne announces he's heading for the Finnish Cap, a distant point that 
causes grumbling among the men until they begin to haul in swordfish like
there's no tomorrow.  Meanwhile, the audience is clued in to the birth of the
devasting storm by witnessing the plight of three people (Bob Gunton,
Karen Allen and Cherry Jones) forced to issue Mayday from a yacht and
the weather reports being watched in fear back on the barstools of Gloucester.
"The Perfect Storm" bears some resemblance to another seafaring flick,
Stephen Spielberg's "Amistad," a film of quality that demanded admiration
without quite achieving a strong emotional response in the viewer.  
Petersen and his special effects/technical crew deliver an astoundingly
realistic storm and put the viewer into the thick of it, whether on
the Gail or inside a Coast Guard rescue copter.  The screenplay establishes
character background, yet once on the boat, the Andrea Gail's crew isn't
all that distinguishable in the face of the elements, unlike, say the three
disparate shark hunters of "Jaws."  They become symbols of 'man
against nature,' while the women at home too fleetingly (yet ably) provide
the emotional impact.
Better is the irony that those who suffered - both the luxury yacht 
vacationers and the blue collar fisherman, wouldn't have been in their 
ultimate predicaments if it weren't for the almighty dollar (the yacht's 
owner foolishing refuses to abandon his boat and the Gloucestermen decide to 
head back through the storm instead of losing their 60,000 lbs. of swordfish), 
although this doesn't extend to the heroic rescuers, one of whom was lost.
"The Perfect Storm" boasts a fine cast, yet the standout performances are
to be found in minor supporting players.  Janet Wright embodies the tough
and gruffly tender North Shore bartender Ethel, whom the fishermen's women
lean on.  Two beautifully real, funny and honest moments are
created between Hodge's hopeful Bugsy and Rusty Schwimmer's initially
distrustful Irene.  The bigger stars are solid, although a concensus of 
emphasis on the Boston area accent would have been nice, with native son
Wahlberg underplaying his, Diane Lane pushing hers north to Maine and
the rest waffling to varying degrees in the middle.
Technically the film is top notch with the aforementioned effects,
cinematography by John Seale ("The Talented Mr. Ripley"), editting
by Richard Francis-Bruce and sound by Keith A. Wester and Eric Gotthelf -
these are the credits that are most likely to be rewarded with Oscar
nominations.  James Horner's ("Titanic") score, however, is rather 
pedestrian.
The swordfish boat Andrea Gail, also called a long-liner for the miles of
fishing gear they play out for a night's fishing, has not had a good season.
Her captain, Billy Tyne (George Clooney), has always prided himself on "getting 
the fish," so he decides to take the risk of a late season run, unknowingly 
setting a course that will bring him and his crew in harm's way of director 
Wolfgang Petersen's "The Perfect Storm."
The lucrative North Atlantic fishing grounds is a hard place to make a living
in the best of weather. In 1991, late season hurricane Grace took an
uncharacteristic turn away from the East Coast of the United States and
barreled out into the Atlantic. Simultaneously, two other storms formed nearby 
with alarming intensity. These three massive weather systems collided directly 
in the path of the Andrea Gail and these events are brought to life on the big 
screen from Sebastian Junger's book, the true-life adventure, "The Perfect 
Storm."  The book covers far more than the fate of the missing Gloucester boat 
and deals with the destiny of other unfortunates who experience the real power 
of Mother Nature. As expected, the film has a very different focus than the 
Junger nonfiction novel.
The movie, directed by the talented Wolfgang Petersen ("Das Boot") and adapted
for the screen by William D. Wittliff and Bo Goldman, takes the essence of the
very technical details of Junger's book and gives it a human face. As you'd
expect in a major F/X event film such as "The Perfect Storm," the emphasis is
on the raw power of the gigantic storm. The characters are introduced quickly,
personalities and conflicts are established immediately, then the filmmakers
get down to the business of making an epic scale disaster flick. The actors 
aren't just along for the ride, but they do take a back seat to the stupendous 
storm of the title.
As such, "The Perfect Storm" does exactly what it sets out to do. Petersen and
his team pour their film crafting talents into the project and come out with a
first rate adventure that keeps you on the edge of your seat once the action
begins. The seamless nature of the awesome storm effects defies the viewer to
see the F/X sleight of hand that takes place on the screen. The immensity of
the perfect storm is depicted with an incredible realism that makes you almost 
feel the rain, wind and waves. And there are some big mutha waves!
The screenplay centers on the last trip of the doomed Andrea Gail, one of the
Gloucester fishing fleet that survives on its annual haul of swordfish. It's a
fickle business, though, and the key is not to catch the most fish, but to get
it back to port first, when the prices are best. Captain Tyne gambles that
being the only sworder out in the stormy Atlantic in November is worth the risk 
to get a successful haul. The captain and his crew, going much farther out than 
normal this trip, make a killing and fill the holds with swordfish. The giant 
storm is not a problem - until the ship's ice making machine irreparably breaks 
down, forcing the Andrea Gail to save the catch by taking the direct path home 
- into the heart of the storm of the century.
The production is first class on many levels. The working class, blue color
costuming, with loads of flannel, by Erica Phillips ("The General's Daughter)
practically reeks of fish. Set design by William Sandell ("Deep Blue Sea"),
especially the confines of the Andrea Gail, are convincing. John Seale's great
lensing captures the feel of Gloucester and provides fast and furious filming
during the action sequences. Kudos to the F/X team, with the help of Industrial
Light & Magic, that creates 100-foot waves, spectacular air-sea rescue action
and gut wrenching sequences that squelched any desire I had to become a
swordfisherman.
Although the cast of "The Perfect Storm" plays second fiddle to the special
F/X, they are, to a man and woman, professional and give as much depth to their
characters as allowed. Clooney plays Captain Tyne as a cool professional
sailor, but one whose facade is showing cracks in his self-confidence. Mark 
Wahlberg dusts off his Boston accent for the role of Bobby Shatford, the rookie 
crewman on the Andrea Gail who Tyne calls a natural seaman. John C. Reilly and 
William Fichtner play adversaries, Murph and Sully, who drop their animosity 
when danger arises. Those left back on land make the most out of their small 
roles, especially Janet Wright who plays Bobby's mother and friend to his 
girlfriend, Christina Cotter (Diane Lane).
More interesting and believable than "Mission: Impossible 2," but not nearly
the fun of "Shaft," "The Perfect Storm" is the perfect picture for the looming 
hot summer nights. I wouldn't recommend it to anyone planning a cruise anytime
soon.  I give it a B+.
For more Reeling reviews visit www.reelingreviews.com

Author
Lars Lindahl
Reviewed by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, John C.
Reilly, Diane Lane, John Hawkes, Allen Payne, William
Fichtner, Karen Allen, Bob Gunton, Janet Wright, Rusty
Schwimmer, Dash Mihok, Michael Ironside, and Mary
Elizabeth Mastrantonio
Wolfgang Petersen's latest, The Perfect Storm, is like
a pineapple. It only tastes good after arduous peeling
and digging - if you try to eat the fruit, spikes and
all, it's going to hurtquite a bit. OK, maybe that
was a confusing analogy, so here's my main complaint
about the latest man battles nature flick: there isn't
really much of a story to tell. Basically, a
Massachusetts fishing crew goes out to sea on a small
boat, called the Andrea Gail, and gets stuck in the
middle of "the storm of the century." How much time
does it take for Petersen to tell this story? Not
nearly enough. So he spends the majority of the film
developing pointless side stories which all eventually
become superfluous. Audiences want to see the storm,
they want to see a fight for survival but what they
get is a lot of cliched, maudlin drivel. The last
quarter of The Perfect Storm is utterly perfect in
every aspect, but just try lasting the first
three-quarters. 
I have yet to read Sebastian Junger's The Perfect
Storm, but from what I have heard it is an
unforgettable tale. Based on a true story, the book
must have found some other way to introduce the
characters because in the movie version, the approach
is weak. Using a wonderfully patriotic score by James
Horner, Petersen almost hides the in-your-face
banality. Right away the central characters are
introduced: the gritty, determined captain (George
Clooney), the ingenue (Mark Wahlberg) torn between his
job and his girlfriend (Diane Lane), the loving father
(John C. Reilly), the comic relief who's always trying
to get laid (John Hawkes), the new guy (William
Fichtner) who immediately antagonizes a crewmate and
the quiet, French guy (Allen Payne). So many problems
strike the opening segment of the film that the
remaining portions directly suffer. It is not the
all-star cast's fault, just the characters designed
for their portrayal. Allen Payne's character never
speaks in the entire movie, not because he is mute,
but because he's never given any lines! Are we
supposed to root for a guy whose face and voice we are
never given a chance to interact with? Fichtner's
character is terribly underdeveloped - we don't know
what he's doing there, where he's from, or who he's
supposed to be. The remaining four fishermen are all
cardboard stereotypes (Hawkes says to a female
stranger in one scene "You know what would look good
on you? Me!" Ooooh real creative).
As the script advances and the Andrea Gail floats
farther out into the waters, the crew continues to not
feel human. Only when the storm takes center stage
does the movie jump out of its sleepwalk. The
computer-generated images of gigantic waves crashing
against a helpless boat are thunderously real. I can
only imagine if this was an IMAX film, this city kid
would surely never go in the water again. This is
loud, jolting entertainment - adjectives that
completely negate the rest of the film. 
The Perfect Storm was unfortunately a disappointment.
The maelstrom lived up to its potential but everything
else failed to do so. I guess I'll stick to that other
Survival spectacleyou know the one on CBS?

Author
Bob Bloom

 The Perfect Storm (2000) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring George Clooney,
Mark Wahlberg, John C. Reilly, William Fichtner, Diane Lane and Mary
Elizabeth Mastrantonio. Music by James Horner. Screenplay
by Bill Wittliff, based on the book by Sebastian Junger. Directed by
Wolfgang Petersen.
 "The Perfect Storm" could have been one of those classic man vs. the
elements sagas in which a group of individuals heroically battle nature
with all their heart, soul and courage.
 And while director Wolfgang Petersen's dramatization of Sebastian
Junger's best-selling novel is at times breathtaking and awesome, it
lacks the emotional resonance of a "Captains Courageous" or "The Old Man
and the Sea."
 The fault possibly lies in the screenplay, adapted by Bill Wittliff.
Wittliff is a fine writer, having adapted "Lonesome Dove" for
television. His screen credits include "The Black Stallion" and
"Barbarosa." On the down side, they also include "Legends of the Fall"
and "The Cowboy Way."
 hat Wittliff has failed to do is create a bond between the audience and
the main protagonists, so when they meet their ultimate fate, the impact
is muted.
 To be fair, this may not all be Wittliff's doing. He had to whittle
Junger's book down to a reasonable two-hour-plus running time. And in
doing so something had to be jettisoned.
 Unfortunately, it was character development in lieu of the many shots
of giant waves crashing into the swordfishing boat Andrea Gail.
 Thus we get penciled doodles instead of completed portraits of the crew
of the Andrea Gail. It also doesn't help that some of the dialogue
mouthed by these Gloucester, Mass., fishermen sounds cliched and
unnatural, as if it was written for them.
 The real heroes of "The Perfect Storm" are the technicians at
Industrial Light & Magic who have created some stomach churning effects
that will have you reaching for sea sickness pills.
 But "The Perfect Storm" is a human drama, a story of hubris,
stubbornness, tenacity and reckless moxie.
 This true tale takes place in late October of 1991. Capt. Billy Tyne
(George Clooney) has endured a run of disappointing catches. His pride
is hurt moreso than his wallet, and he decides to make one last outing
for a big score.
 Tyne gathers his crew. Among them are Bobby (Mark Wahlberg), who needs
the money to begin a new life with his girl, Chris (Diane Lane); Dale
`Murph' Murphy (John C. Reilly), a veteran seaman who is supporting his
estranged wife and son; and Sully (William Fichtner), a sharp-tongued
individual who does as little work as possible.
 They set out for the Grand Banks, but when the fishing there proves
inadequate they push on to the Flemish Cap. Tyne ignores all the
warnings about an upcoming storm and, like a mini-Ahab, pursues his
prey.
 What Wittliff's script fails to provide is a rational motivation for
Tyne's action. Is it pride because he has been outfished by a rival
captain (the lovely Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio)? Is it guilt because of
the failure to provide a decent payoff for his crew? Is it a way to
prove to his boss, the owner of the Andrea Gail, that he's still a
top-flight skipper, a worthy seaman?
 It might be a combination of all three, but the characters are so
weakly defined that we never know sure what galvanizes his decisions.
  The script's shortcomings are slightly compensated by the movie's
first-rate cast and ILM's computer graphic effects.
Clooney is scruffy and a bit sea-worn as Tyne, a proud man sure of his
knowledge of the sea and its fishing lanes.
 Wahlberg is appealing, filled with puppy-dog sincerity as the young man
in love. But he really is given little to do except admire Tyne's
seamanship.
 Reilly is tough and tender as a man with a hole in his heart. `Murph'
loves his son, and it devastates him that he must return to the sea
instead of being able to spend time with the boy.
 Again, a script problem fails to explain the animosity between Murphy
and Sully, even though the pair finally do reach some sort of
understanding.
 All in all, the characters merely seem like archetypes instead of
full-bodied individuals.
 A James Horner score helps propel the action. It is not as bombastic as
you'd expect for a movie of this type. In some scenes it has a lyrical,
sea-chanty lilt.
 Overall, "The Perfect Storm" is an imperfect feature. This is one movie
that probably could have used a longer running time for more character
exposition.
 As it is, "The Perfect Storm" is a mighty adventure that lacks any real
personal warmth. It has a cold, detached feeling. The human dimension
that director Petersen brought to his other seafaring outing, the
classic "Das Boot," is the element most needed to hoist "The Perfect
Storm" into the pantheon of great sea movies.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten
 Warner Bros./Baltimore Spring Creek Pictures
 Director: Wolfgang Petersen
 Writer:  William D. Wittliff, book by Sebastian Junger
 Cast: George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Diane Lane, Karen
Allen, William Fichtner, Bob Gunton, Mary Elizabeth
Mastrantonio, John C. Reilly, Allen Payne, John Hawkes,
Janet Wright, Rusty Schwimmer
 Screened at: Loews E-Walk Theater, NYC
   "The Perfect Storm" deals with the sorts of people who
love their job as professional fishermen so much that they'd
happily spend their retirement years with a rod and line as
well.  This bunch, though, are destined never to see those
leisure years given the vagaries of nature.  While the sea
provides these fellows with the source of their income, it can
be a vicious enemy as well, whether leaving them high and
dry and bereft of anything to catch or wildly rich with a
bounteous catch which, alas, will never be brought to market. 
We give nothing away to say this, as the movie is based on
Sebastian Junger's non-fiction tale of a boat called the
Andrea Gail which in October 1991 sailed from Gloucester,
Massachusetts to the remote area of Flemish Cap, so far
removed from familiar waters that the risk of being cast adrift
by a storm would be disastrous to its crew.
   But the hardy fellows in the Andrea Gail are Gloucester
fishermen, a macho band who take as much pride in their
profession as would a group of scientists finding a cure for
the common cold.  The principal drawback of the story is that
because it is based on an actual disaster with which many in
the audience would be familiar, there is little suspense. 
Adding to that flaw, director Wolfgang Petersen--who helmed
the much more trenchant "Das Boot"--gives us little in the
way of character development this time, so that we fail
emotionally to become sufficiently caught up in their fate.
   The picture opens in a dive at the Gloucester docks known
as the Crow's Nest, the sort of place that we expect to see
out west where the locals have nothing to do but drink,
dance, and rent upstairs rooms by the hour.  We are
introduced to the men and the women who care for them.
Billy Tyne (George Clooney), a divorced father with a
perpetual three-day growth of hair on his face, is in a slide. 
The fish in the area are not biting, he's coming home with a
pittance, and his pride is hurt so much that he is determined
to risk all to break out of his slump with a grand-slam catch.
A fellow divorce, Bobby Shatford (Mark Wahlberg) is attached
to the just about the only good-looking girl among these salt-
of-the-earth townspeople, Christine Cotter (Diane Lane), while
Murph (John C. Reilly), Bugsy (John Hawkes), Alfred Pierre
(Allen Payne) and David Sullivan (William Fichtner) fill out the
crew.  
   Petersen divides the film into two segments.  One involves
the women who are left behind, with whom he milks the
stereotypical situation of landlubbing females pining for their
men while dreading the occupation they have chosen.  The
other deals with the way these guys relate to one another,
which is predictable enough except for the perplexing and
unmotivated enmity between Murph and Sullivan.  Once the
big storm hits--the storm of the century, thanks to the
confluence of three pressure areas in the same location--the
struggle for survival eventuates, a tussle that involves the
brave machinations of a group of Air Force helicopter pilots
whose job is to locate boats in trouble and rescue the
inhabitants with the aid of a dropped basket.  To break up the
monotony, Petersen introduces an analogous situation, that
of a yacht also caught in nature's wrath and which is the
object of yet another daring rescue attempt by both a Coast
Guard vessel and the chopper chugging just above the water
with zero visibility.
   The failure to develop any of the characters, the absence
of suspense from a story well known by the audience, and
perhaps most of all the artificial, computerized look of the big
waves combine like the three meteorological pressure points to
make this $140 million feature as disappointing to the
audience as the senseless loss of lives is to the people who
care for these bold anglers.
Rated PG-13.  Running time: 129 minutes.  (C) 2000 by
Harvey Karten, film_critic@compuserve.com

Author
Chad Polenz
Take all the action and adventure of a guy's summer popcorn flick and combine 
it with all the teary drama
of a sensitive, autumn Oscar-contender and that's what you've got with "The 
Perfect Storm." It's the story
of a small New England fishing boat and its scrappy crew who go out into 
uncharted waters and must race
two hurricanes back to the coast. 
The story is pretty predictable so it's up to the screenplay and the SFX 
department to make the film work
and they manage to pull it off pretty well. The first half is an enjoyable 
lighthearted drama that sets up all
the characters and their admirable qualities (in other words - blatant 
foreshadowing). The second half is
non-stop action as the crew must navigate through terrible weather in the 
middle of the ocean. There's also
a sub-plot involving the coast guard and how they rescue people in terrible 
storms like this. It has
absolutely nothing to do with the main story but it's a nice touch. 
Overall it's a touching movie in that "Titanic" sort of way. It's got 
something for everyone. 
Chad'z Movie Page is back! 
New reviews of the latest movies in easy-to-swallow capsule form with the 
trendy, Entertainment Weekly-style of letter grades instead of the old star 
system. Have I sold out? Visit my page and decide for yourself ;-)

Author
Edwin Jahiel
THE PERFECT STORM (2000) ***  Directed by Wolfgang Petersen. Written 
by Bill Wittliff from the book by Sebastian Junger. Photography, John 
Seale. Editing, Richard Francis-Bruce. Production design, William 
Sandell. Music, James Horner. Cast:  George Clooney (Capt. Billy 
Tyne), Mark Wahlberg (Bobby Shatford), Diane Lane (Christina Cotter), 
William Fichtner (Sully), Karen Allen (Melissa Brown), Allen Payne 
(Alfred Pierre), Bob Gunton (Alexander McAnally III), Mary Elizabeth 
Mastrantonio (Linda Greenlaw),John C. Reilly (Murph), et al. 
Produced by Paula Weinstein, Wolfgang Petersen and Gail Katz. A 
Warners release 130 minutes.  PG-13.
On Halloween 1991 three huge, nasty, raging weather systems collided 
in the North Atlantic to produce a storm that has been variously 
called the storm of the century, the perfect storm (no callousness 
here, just a meteorologist's view) and other superlatives. It did a 
lot of damage at sea as well as on land.
Commercial fishing is a dangerous profession. In the film we see the 
real monument dedicated to the ten thousand Gloucester people who 
died at sea between 1626 and our day.
New Englander Sebastian Junger, who was living in Gloucester, Mass., 
at the time, wrote the best-selling book "The Perfect Storm" which 
focused on a swordfishing boat, the Andrea Gail, which ventured to 
sea at a risky time and eventually found itself in the eye of the 
storm.
The fishing season is about over. It has not been kind to Andrea 
Gail's Captain Tyne (Clooney) and his small crew. The boat returns to 
Gloucester after a last, unproductive outing. Most of their meager 
earnings goes to the ship owner (a political criticism here?). 
Captain Tyne decides to take a chance on a last sortie, in spite of 
the dangerously late season.
The first 40 or 45 minutes concentrate on the background,   the 
people of Gloucester, variously sketched portraits and relationships 
of the fishermen of the Andrea Gail. Given the total length of the 
film (two-and-a-half hours) my first reaction to this focus on people 
was that it was too little. My second reaction was "too much." My 
third and last one was "just right." Less stress would have 
de-personalized the characters. More stress might be forcing the 
dosage by getting too generous with psycho-sociological issues among 
essentially normal working-class persons.
When the boat takes to the ocean again and the results are not 
brilliant, the Captain decides to push his luck (or is it unluck?) by 
pushing on to a dangerous place called the Flemish Cap which is at 
the edge of the fishing map. It's taking a big chance, but "that's 
where the fish are."
The perilous venture is an adventure, but the fishing is a bonanza of 
swordfish worth a quarter million dollars. Then  the ice-making 
machine goes kaput while the weather turns very nasty. If the boat 
stays put and waits for better conditions, the haul will spoil. The 
men vote to return to port in spite of the weather -- which goes from 
bad to worse and from worse to unspeakably horrible.
The storm is the real raison d'etre of the movie. And it goes on and 
on. And it's a lulu, that is, a killer lulu. If, until it really 
hits, you thought that the film had its share of deja vu, the storm 
makes it a "jamais vu" ("never seen"). With a super-lavish, quite 
extraordinary use of special effects, tricks of the trade, digital 
manipulations, and the largest studio tank made even bigger, the 
images and their motions are stunning. While you know that it's all 
done with mirrors, you can't help getting gripped. The screen 
transports you from edge-of-the seat tension to nail-biting to 
heart-stopping reactions. Yes, it's only a movie, but its raw 
suspense gets scarier and scarier, what with waves reaching a height 
of one hundred feet, what with a pleasure craft, a small yacht on its 
way to Bermuda  also getting hit by the Revenge of Neptune, what with 
totally convincing and heroic efforts of a Coast Guard helicopter 
trying to save the souls at sea,  what with refueling the 'copter in 
the air... and much else which I will not mention.
It's funny how connections are made in one's mind. Somehow I kept 
thinking about The Cruel Sea. That was a best-seller by Nicholas 
Montsarrat, about convoy duty in the Royal Navy during WWII. A fine 
movie was made of the book in 1953, with a script by the great Eric 
Ambler.
Direct connections that the viewers can make after seeing the picture 
would be two different, very good one-hour programs on cable, one 
stressing the making of the movie, the other stressing the fishermen 
of Gloucester. And another private connection to me in "The Perfect 
Storm" is the memorial service where is sung "Eternal Father, Strong 
to Save" also known as "For Those in Peril on the Sea" which, with 
different words, was my school's song.
German-born director Petersen is good at "Sturm und Drang" (Storm and 
Stress) situations, and good too at motley people confined within one 
space. He did both with his "Das Boot" (1981) the best ever submarine 
film, with the fanciful "Air Force One," and does it here again, 
spectacularly. If he could show "Storm" in 3-D he'd have audiences 
bringing raincoats to the theater.
"Das Boot" was at first a very successful German TV miniseries, then 
became the major international hit. (It is, by the way, one of the 
most mispronounced titles in English, since it should sound like 
"boat" and not "boot").  Its success opened American doors to 
Petersen. There followed some ho-hum pictures, "The Neverending 
Story," "Enemy Mine, " and "Shattered." He bounced back with the 
thriller "In The Line Of Fire" starring Clint Eastwood back-slid with 
"Outbreak," and picked up again with "Air Force One."
Petersen is now an "American" director, but several of his earlier 
German movies, about 20  in 1967-78, mostly for German TV, were 
remarkable. I would strongly recommend "Die Konsequenz" (1977) and 
especially "Black and White Like Day and Night," (1978), starring 
Bruno Ganz in a fascinating, unusual work about obsession with chess, 
made just before "Das Boot." It is available from Facets (www. 
facets.org), the premier video source in the country. Like many of 
the earlier Petersen films it shows that he is not only an action 
director but a versatile filmmaker also interested in social, 
political, psychological and intimate subjects.
"Le mauvais gout mene au crime"(Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's film reviews are at: http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel/

Author
Dennis Schwartz

PERFECT STORM, THE (director: Wolfgang Petersen; screenwriter: Bill
Wittliff/based on the book by Sebastian Junger; cinematographer: John
Seale; editor: Richard Francis-Bruce; cast: George Clooney (Capt. Billy
Tyne), Mark Wahlberg (Bobby Shatford), Diane Lane (Christina Cotter),
William Fichtner (Sully), Karen Allen (Melissa Brown), Allen Payne
(Alfred Pierre), Bob Gunton (Alexander McAnally III), Mary Elizabeth
Mastrantonio (Capt. Linda Greenlaw), John C. Reilly (Murph), John Hawkes
(Bugsy), Michael Ironside (Ship Owner), Rusty Schwimmer (Irene), 2000)
The perfect storm is based on Sebastian Junger's best-selling nonfiction
book. It is about a Gloucester, Mass., fishing skipper, Billy Tyne
(George Clooney), and his five-man crew aboard a small swordfishing
boat, the Andrea Gail, who go out deep into the North Atlantic, to a
place where they never fished before, a place that is almost off their
fishing map, called the Flemish Cap, because the captain is in a fishing
slump and must protect his reputation and he knows there are fish in
those waters. It's all about money and pride.
The film is long on man-against-nature action scenes filmed with graphic
computerized special effects, but short on character development and
human drama. It is a commercial film, driven by the usual formula used
for disaster movies. It is directed by Wolfgang Petersen, the German
director of "Das Boot," the best submarine picture ever made. The film
succeeds as a nail-biter. It paints a real picture of the fishing town
and how tough it is to exist for the fishermen: economically, family
wise, and because of the inherent dangers of the profession. So when the
men battle the storm at sea, we are affected by their struggle to
survive.
In 1991, on Halloween, the Great Nor'easter occurred out in the Atlantic
Ocean, it was described by meteorologists as something that they never
saw happen before in this century, two hurricane weather fronts
combining as one, which they called the perfect storm. The crew aboard
the Andrea Gail, consisting of: Murph (Reilly), a good-hearted soul, who
is separated from his wife and young son, losing them to his
professional duties, even though he loves both of them dearly -- but
commercial fishermen on swordfishing boats go out to sea for as long as
a month at a time and he loses touch with his wife after those long
absences; Bugsy (Hawkes), who is someone searching desperately for any
woman, in any port; Alfred (Payne), the lone black man aboard; Sully
(Fichtner), the wiseguy with a chip on his shoulder, but who proves
himself heroic when he helps rescue his rival Murph, who fell
overboard--he is a replacement for another crew member who refused to
go; Bobby (Wahlberg), who reluctantly casts out after much doubt about
this fishing trip since he just came back from being out for a long
time. He is in love with the perfect girl, Christina (Lane), and needs
money both to pay his ex-wife for child support and for his upcoming
marriage to Christina. One day he wants to be his own skipper--he has
the only natural New England accent in the film; and, lastly, there is
the skipper, Bill Tyne, who is separated from his wife and two
daughters, whose love for the sea and his skills as a captain shouldn't
be questioned.
Once the storm blows and these men are caught in it, the men become
secondary figures and the storm takes over as the film's star. Most of
the second-half of the film is taken over by computer graphics, as we
witness the boat trying to make it back home amid gigantic waves of over
100-feet covering the boat and of winds of over fifty miles per hour.
Our sympathy for the men is somewhat diminished by their choice of not
sitting out the storm in the safe waters where they were, but on
insisting on returning home through the storm because their ice machine
broke. If they remained put, their great haul of fish would be
destroyed. The men were clearly driven by greed, and the captain might
be intrepid, but he made a dumb decision listening to his crew. The only
real heroes in this movie were the Air Force and Coast Guard rescuers,
who risked their lives to save these foolhardy men and pull from the sea
three members of a yacht caught in the same waters.
When their vessel is down, Bobby tells the captain, we gave it good
ride...words that seem futile and misplaced, though certainly gallant.
But it is the only glimmer of intelligent dialogue that appeared to be
taking place in the last 45-minutes, ever since the giant waves crested
against the boat and the men could only be seen in the dark with their
yellow slickers.
Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio is the captain of the Andrea Gail's sister
ship, the
Hannah Boden, and she is more than a friend to Captain Tyne; while,
Michael Ironside is the man who owns both boats. All the side stories
are superfluous to the storm.
Even though the film has a bleak ending and awkward dialogue, it has
blockbuster written all over its sails. I think the public will accept
the grim outcome and relish viewing the storm and the terrible damage it
causes, because it is the kind of action film they will want to see this
summer, while they munch on some popcorn in an air-conditioned theater.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Steve Rhodes
"Billy, you're not going to like this, but I'm going to say it anyway:
You be careful," swordfish boat captain Linda Greenlaw (Mary Elizabeth
Mastrantonio) radios to captain Billy Tyne, played with a single, wooden
expression by George Clooney.
Yes, she's right.  He doesn't like it, and he doesn't listen, even if
he's endangering the lives of his crew by knowingly sailing into the
"Storm of the Century" in order to bring home a lucrative catch.  You,
however, will have to listen to lots of such hackneyed dialog in THE
PERFECT STORM, a TV disaster movie of the week masquerading as this
summer's big action picture.
You might think Billy's foolhardy actions would make him the villain of
this piece, but it doesn't.  In a bit of class hatred, William
Wittliff's script reserves that role for the owner of the boat that
Billy seems destined to smash to smithereens.
Based on a popular book by Sebastian Junger, the movie claims to be
based on a true story, which in a way it is.  But the facts that the
book had to work from are sketchy so that it has to be described as a
fictional tale based on what we know about a true story.  This, however,
has little to do with the problems in the movie.
As the story opens, we find ourselves stuck in a long half-hour soap
opera about Gloucester fishermen and their families with divorced being
the most common state.  At first, it seems like the picture will never
get into gear.
At the center of the story is Billy, a captain who has been having a
string of bad luck lately with catches so small that his crew has begun
to doubt him.  But, since they all share in the take, they agree to sail
out with him one more time to the Grand Banks before the season ends.
For those few viewers who do not know the ending, the picture feels
obligated to telegraph it for them frequently.  "The Grand Banks are no
joke in October," the mother of junior crew member Bobby Shatford (Mark
Wahlberg) sternly warns him.  With a beautiful girlfriend (Diane Lane)
who needs money, he's willing to risk the late season journey.  She has
kids from a previous marriage and requires funds for a lawyer so she can
sue to get them back.
After a lot of petty bickering on board ship and after a slew of bad
luck, the storm finally hits.  The surprise is that the action in the
center ring about the boat isn't in the least bit edge-of-the seat
material.  No matter how much water they splash around and no matter how
rocky the waves are around the toy models, they are never credible.  And
with the fast action editing, it becomes one long, tedious and blurry
bore.  Even when the end seems near, our eyes are the only dry part of
the theater.  The movie just never creates characters worth caring
about.
On the other hand, there are two significant subplots in the side rings.
A clichéd one involves a sailboat skippered with stupid bravado.  A much
better one concerns the rescue helicopter sent out to save both of our
foolish captains.  The remarkable bravery of the helicopter crew is the
only compelling story in the movie.
Finally, there is the manipulative ending, of which the less said the
better.  James Horner's dramatic music conjures up images of the much
better film that I thought I was going to see -- one that was worthy of
the movie's superlative director, Wolfgang Petersen (DAS BOOT).
Instead, I got little models tossed around in choppy water.  If I had
seen the movie on television, where it belongs, I would have turned it
off.  The fishermen of Gloucester, of which 10,000 have died since 1632
according to the ending credits, deserve a more fitting memorial that
this motion picture.
THE PERFECT STORM runs a long 2:09.  It is rated PG-13 for language and
scenes of peril and would be acceptable for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
 
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com ">http://www.InternetReviews.com> 

Author
Rose 'Bams' Cooper
THE PERFECT STORM (2000)
Rated R; running time 135 minutes
Genre: Drama/Action
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0177971
Official site: http://www.perfectstorm.net/
Written by: William D. Wittliff (based on the book by Sebastian Junger)
Directed by: Wolfgang Petersen
Cast: George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Diane Lane, John C. Reilly,
John Hawkes, William Fichtner, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio,
Michael Ironside, Allen Payne, Janet Wright, Karen Allen,
Bob Gunton (Alexander McAnally III), Rusty Schwimmer (Big Red),
Josh Hopkins (Lt. Barry Ennis), Cherry Jones (Edie Bailey),
Dash Mihok (Lt. Kenny Mitchell)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsperfect.html
There's a scene in THE PERFECT STORM where the six Glouchester
swordfishermen look out over the bow of their ship and see nothing but
plain ugly skies coming ahead of them, knowing full well that they'd
soon be heading into that ugliness, since home was that'away.  As a
frequent long-distance motorcyclist, I could Feel Their Pain; many a day
have I put on my raingear and cursed the sky for what it was about to
let loose on me.  But after seeing this movie, and remembering that it
was based on a true story, I think it'll be a long time before I
complain about Nasty Weather again...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Based on the true story, THE PERFECT STORM tells of a group of
Glouchester, Massachusetts swordfishermen in October 1991 who find
themselves caught up in something much bigger than themselves, and who
only want to get through it and go home.
Captain Billy Tyne (George Clooney) feels the pressure to Go Fish put on
him by the owner of the boat he loves so much--the "Andrea Gail"; owner
Bobby Brown (Michael Ironside) compares Billy unfavorably to fellow
captain Linda Greenlaw (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio), who just brought
in a near-record haul of swordfish.  Needing to get out of his slump,
for pride's sake as well as to make money for himself and his crew,
Billy convinces crewmen Bobby Shatford (Mark Wahlberg), Dale "Murph"
Murphy (John C. Reilly), David "Sully" Sullivan (William Fichtner),
Michael "Bugsy" Moran (John Hawkes)  and Alfred Pierre (Allen Payne), to
go out one more time that fatal October.  The October when three monster
storms converged on their Atlantic fishing grounds to create the perfect
storm.
The Upshot:
This film had a ton of hype, from awareness of the book by Sebastian
Junger and especially from the trailer depicting the huge tidalwave the
"Andrea Gail" tried to ride out.  And from my seat, it lived up to the
hype--and then some.
[It's almost a joke to me that sharing the results of this true story
could be considered giving away spoiler info, but I'll play along].
The human stories revolving around that tragic incident, were intensely
played--especially the relationship between Bobby and his girlfriend
Christina (Diane Lane).  Generally speaking, Mark Wahlberg doesn't move
me much; but he and Lane had a chemistry in their short screen time
together that made their love story seem almost epic.  And a "love
story" of a different kind, between George Clooney's Captain Billy and
Walberg's Bobby, was best realized during their storm scenes together.
The two actors are said to have a great working relationship, and it
showed (though an early scene where Billy tells Bobby his Reason For
Being A Fisherman, felt somewhat stilted).  Clooney gets much lip for
the underwhelming movies he's been in, with implications made that he's
just a Hollywood Pretty Boy with more connections than talent.  I don't
know about all that, but he comes across as Just Folks in the interviews
that I've seen of him; and his excellent portrayal of Billy Tyne in
"Perfect" should quiet any rumblings about his perceived lack of talent.
Good, too, were the performances by supporting players John C. Reilly
(as Murph, a newly divorced dad who, much to my surprise, got along
decently with his ex), William Fichtner (as Sully, who Murph decidedly
did not get along well with), and especially John Hawkes as Bugsy.
"Especially", I say, because Bugsy's short time with Irene was as sweet
as Bobby and Christina's more intense love story, while having the added
benefit of seeming more downhome; more real.
I found fault with what seemed at first to be an inexplicable inclusion
of a second rescue attempt involving a sailboat in the Bahamas.  Aside
from the strange leap of logic that involved [uh, isn't Massachusetts
damn near a country away from the Bahamas?  So, uh, why would the same
US Coast Guard crew try to rescue both that sailboat and the "Andrea
Gail"?  And uh, was there no other crew available anywhere near
Massachusetts?], that subplot seemed an unnecessary distraction to the
main story at first.  And as usual, Karen Allen (as Melissa Brown, one
of the people on the sailboat) proved once again that her pinnacle
performance, in RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, was more a fluke than a
breakthrough.  All was made Right, however, when the Coast Guard
rescuers came along; the story itself picked up, and the remarkable
scenes with the helicopter crew, negated any Issues I had with Allen.
But to be sure, the storm itself, and the depiction of such in this
movie, was as real a "character" as any of the human players involved.
I heard more than one person in the audience say that they felt like
they were right in the thick of the storm; that's a pretty accurate
description of my experience while watching those roiling waters.  I'm
not one to get seasick, but I felt like I needed some Dramamine after
watching this flick.  And not just from the waves, either; the movie
jumped from Bermuda to "Boston" and back so rapidly at points, I got
dizzy from trying to keep up.  This was made more difficult by the fact
that I couldn't always hear the dialogue over the storm, most especially
with most of Allen Payne's dialogue.  I was able to get the general
drift, but I think I'll have to watch "Perfect" a second time to catch
what I missed.   Not that I mind seeing it again.
THE PERFECT STORM could've made the mistake of being only and solely
about that huge tidalwave--and more to the point, about the whiz-bang
computerized special effects that went into making a movie
storm--forgetting about the human story behind the tragedy.  I am glad
it did not; and further, I'm surprised that the movie encompassed far
more than the story of the ill-fated crew of the "Andrea Gail".  Though
he did so at times to the detriment of that central story, director
Wolfgang Petersen skillfully included the tale of folk who tried to
rescue the fishermen as well (not having read the book, I can't know
whether this was more Junger's doing, or Petersen's; either way, I can
diggit).  And though there could've been more backstory shown, and
especially more attention paid to the folks left on-shore (more, that
is, than just Bobby's girlfriend Christina, or his mother Ethel, played
by Janet Wright), I found myself more often than not, riveted by the
action on the screen.  And, the drama got my attention, too.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I would be remiss if I didn't mention Allen Payne (who played Alfred
Pierre, the Other brother who was gettin' much love from a chick
on-shore).  Very remiss--considering the fact that the movie didn't
mention him much.  He seemed to disappear into the background, like a
speck of dust caught up in a towering tidalwave; except for the interest
of historical accuracy (and not a little need for Diversity, I bet), he
may as well not have been here.  Mebbe this flick was just too big for
him, who knows; perhaps a more authentic islander should've been cast
(what was that accent supposed to be, anyway?  For all I know, Alfred
could've been a Frenchman, not a West Indian).  But it sure was a long
way from his best work to date, JASON'S LYRIC, to his imitation of
driftwood here.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I have to admit that I mis(pre)judged this "book" by its cover; unlike
that Titanic joke, THE PERFECT STORM is a spectacular blend of
heart-pounding action and heart-breaking, heart-felt drama.  If Wolfgang
Petersen and company--and yes, that does include George Clooney--don't
get some kind of Oscars recognition for this one, there's something
fishy goin' on here...

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Perfect Storm (2000)
George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, John C. Reilly, Diane Lane, William Fichtner,
John Hawkes, Allen Payne, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, Karen Allen, Cherry
Jones, Bob Gunton, Christopher McDonald, Dash Mihok, Josh Hopkins, Michael
Ironside, Rusty Schwimmer, Janet Wright. Music by James Horner. Screenplay
by Bill Wittliff, based on the book by Sebastian Junger. Directed by
Wolfgang Petersen. 129 minutes.
Rated PG-13, 3 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/ReviewsBy?Edward+Johnson-Ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to
ejohnsonott@prodigy.net or e-mail ejohnsonott-subscribe@onelist.com with the
word "subscribe" in the subject line.
The media kit for "The Perfect Storm" begins with a special request that
reads, "Warner Brothers Pictures would appreciate the press' cooperation in
not revealing the ending of this film to their readers, viewers or
listeners." Fair enough, but for this to work, everyone needs to do his or
her part. So, if you are one of the millions who saw the news reports of the
event in 1991, or if you read Sebastian Junger's book on the subject, which
was on the New York Times bestseller list for over two years, remember:
Mum's the word.
I believe in revealing as little about a movie's plot as possible (and will
adhere to the WB guidelines in this review), but trying to hide the facts
about this widely reported news story strikes me as more than a bit silly.
Imagine the press kit for "Titanic" stating "Please don't tell anyone the
boat sank."
Incidentally, it appears that Warner Brothers forgot to make the same
request of their cast, because I've heard two actors spill the beans on late
night talk shows over the past week.
Set in Gloucester, Massachusetts, a major North Atlantic fishing port, "The
Perfect Storm" deals with those who make their livings from the sea and
focuses on a storm of almost indescribable ferocity, created when three
raging weather fronts collided. Pity the crew of the Andrea Gail, a
swordfishing boat that ventures hundreds of miles out in search of a big
catch. The storm hits full force just as their ice machine breaks down,
leaving the men with two choices: dump their lucrative boatload of fish and
venture even further out to sea in search of calm waters, or try to salvage
their income and pride by navigating through the worst storm in recorded
history.
Sitting in our comfy middle-class homes, we may consider the correct
decision to be painfully obvious. But as the film establishes during its
opening 40 minutes, these people live an extremely challenging life that
requires risks to be taken on a regular basis.
Unfortunately, the screenplay fails to fully flesh out the men as
individuals. The extremely talented cast, led by George Clooney, Mark
Wahlberg and John C. Reilly, must deal with sketchily drawn characters. The
actors give it their all, but remain stereotypes rather than realized
individuals. The folks on the shore, including Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio
and Diane Lane, have little more to do than cry, shout and look worried.
Credit must be given to Rusty Schwimmer, a large woman with an incredibly
expressive face. When crew member Bugsy (John Hawkes) hits on her the night
before the Gail sets off to sea, she recognizes that his need goes beyond a
quick lay. In a quietly touching scene, she shows up dockside the next
morning so that he won't be the only man without anyone to see him off.
As for the storm, I found Wolfgang Petersen's direction so engrossing that I
failed to evaluate the quality of the special effects. The other critics in
attendance complained of numerous unconvincing images, but I didn't notice.
Several action set pieces are thrilling, particularly a shark attack on the
deck of the Gail, Captain Clooney's exploits while trying to repair a broken
mast, and the Coast Guard's amazing rescue efforts.
Speaking of the Coast Guard, a Discovery Channel documentary on the storm
identified the rescue crew by name and featured interviews with them. "The
Perfect Storm" would be a far more satisfying film had they made those Coast
Guard members as prominent, rather than using them as anonymous supporting
players. Unfortunately, to explain further, I would have to violate the
Warner Brothers request, but, after you see the movie, I'm sure you'll know
what I mean.

Author
Shannon Patrick Sullivan
Directed by Wolfgang Petersen. Screenplay by William D Wittliff, based on
the novel by Sebastian Junger. Starring George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg,
John C Reilly. Running time: 129 minutes. Rated PG for mature theme by
the MFCB. Reviewed on July 19th, 2000.
Few movies in recent times have attracted as much interest in 
Newfoundland as "The Perfect Storm". Showings have been selling out 
regularly since opening day, attracting not only the core movie-going 
teen and young adult populations, but people of all ages. This comes as 
little surprise: for five hundred years, the fate of Newfoundlanders has 
been inextricably linked to the sea. Reports of maritime tragedies are 
not infrequent occurrences on local newscasts, and every Newfoundlander 
is deeply aware of how a poor fishing season can break individual 
fishermen and indeed whole communities.
The subject matter of "The Perfect Storm", then, is near and dear to the 
people of this province. Few films could strike more directly at the 
heart of our communal conscience. Although the Newfoundland economy has 
diversified in the past century -- gone are the days when almost everyone 
was a fisherman, or at least related to one -- tales of fierce storms on 
the Atlantic and loved ones lost in the pursuit of the almighty catch 
still ring true to many.
"The Perfect Storm" is like the mother of such stories: the culmination 
of all those tales of horror and tragedy, made all the more chilling (and 
fascinating) because it is based on real events. It is a fact that around 
Hallowe'en of 1991, three separate weather systems -- Hurricane Grace 
coming up out of the Bahamas, a rainstorm crossing westward across the 
ocean, and a cold front sweeping down from the Arctic -- collided in the 
vicinity of the Grand Banks, the vast fishing grounds off the coast of 
Atlantic Canada and New England. The result was one of the worst storms
ever recorded, and the swordboat "Andrea Gail", out of Gloucester,
Massachusetts, was caught in the middle of it.
"The Perfect Storm" dramatises these events. Billy Tyne (George Clooney), 
skipper of the "Andrea Gail", is a once-great captain fallen on hard 
times. His catch for the season is down badly from previous years. 
Determined to turn things around, Billy and his crew -- Murph (John C 
Reilly), Sully (William Fichtner), Bugsy (John Hawkes), Alfred Pierre 
(Allen Payne), and rookie Bobby (Mark Wahlberg) -- elect to make one more 
trip, all the way out to the bountiful Flemish Cap far to the east. 
There, they enjoy a tremendous catch, until their ice machine breaks down.
The crew is by this time aware of the bad weather lying between them and 
Gloucester, but not its severity. Faced with either waiting until the 
storm subsides (and letting their catch spoil) or punching through it, 
they decide to head home. But the first hints of the storm knock out the 
radio, and so Billy is oblivious to the warnings of a friendly rival 
(Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio), that he is heading right into the 
epicentre of a meteorological powderkeg.
"The Perfect Storm" does not get off to a good start. The first half of 
the film moves at a glacial pace, depicting the toll that fishing takes 
on the crewmembers' personal lives. The problem is that none of these 
characters are particularly interesting; the acting, while serviceable, 
is uniformly unremarkable. Though a certain amount of character-building 
is necessary in order to involve us emotionally in the picture, it is 
simply overdone. Too much time is spent developing these characters (and  
not in particularly imaginative ways) than can be justified by the 
relatively insignificant and melodramatic payoff at the end.
The movie is just marking time, until the storm hits the "Andrea Gail" 
and the action really begins. We are therefore forced to endure contrived 
animosity between Murph and Sully, present for no other reason than to 
generate some spark during the early tedium. It says something that the 
most engrossing sequences of the first half have nothing to do with the 
"Andrea Gail" at all, but rather with a small luxury yacht, the 
"Mistral", sailing for the Bahamas and so caught up in the storm earlier 
on. The rescue of the "Mistral"'s crew by a coast guard helicopter is 
genuine edge-of-the-seat material. Indeed, the entire subplot involving
the coast guard unit (which later tracks the "Andrea Gail") generates 
many of "The Perfect Storm"'s best and most heartfelt moments.
Once the "Andrea Gail" and the storm do collide, the intensity of the 
movie finally picks up, and I cannot deny that I enjoyed these scenes 
mightily. Watching Tyne and his crew struggle against nature was both an 
inspiring and heartrending experience: I was already well aware of their 
ultimate fate, but I admired their determination to get back to port. 
These scenes are also nicely counterpointed by tense, quiet glimpses of 
the fishermen's family and friends back in Gloucester, gathered at a 
local tavern and waiting desperately for news while the storm rages
outside.
Unfortunately, while the action in the second hour is undeniably 
riveting, it is marred by poor production values. The computer-generated 
images of the "Andrea Gail" riding the towering waves are certainly 
impressive. But they are also very artificial: the water moves like 
textured jelly, and the boat is lit and outlined in a very unrealistic 
manner. Also off-putting are some of the onboard scenes, especially those 
set after dark, which are clearly shot in a water tank -- it is hard to 
shake the impression that the "ocean" ends about five feet off screen.
Admittedly, the power of the second half of "The Perfect Storm" is almost 
enough to make me forget all this. Almost. Perhaps if I hadn't been 
lulled into such listlessness by the first half, I would have been more 
easily drawn into the fiction. But "The Perfect Storm" is desperately 
unbalanced. The filmmakers should have taken a cue from the title that 
the real star is not the fishermen, but the storm itself. "The Perfect 
Storm" is simply a good disaster movie, in the tradition of "Twister". An 
excellent drama could no doubt be made about the trials of Atlantic 
fishermen, but "The Perfect Storm" is not that movie.
Copyright Š 2000 Shannon Patrick Sullivan.
Archived at The Popcorn Gallery,
  http://www.physics.mun.ca/~sps/movies/ThePerfectStorm.html
  _______________________________________________________________________
 / Shannon Patrick Sullivan  | "We are all in the gutter, but some of us \
|       shannon@mun.ca       |  are looking at the stars." - Oscar Wilde |
 \___________________________|__________________________________________/
  | Popcorn Gallery Movie Reviews    www.physics.mun.ca/~sps/movies.html | 
  | Doctor Who: A Brief History of Time (Travel)            /drwho.html  |

Author
Jon Popick
The 2000 summer movie season is just about half over and, so far, the
big action blockbusters that seemed the most promising when we were all
still wearing hats and mittens have really let us down.  M:I-2?  Forget
about it.  Gone in 60 Seconds?  Plot holes bigger than the Grand
Canyon.  And you can chalk this one right up there with the others.  The
Perfect Storm is the perfect bore and, although it's only a two-hour
film, it seems like a three-hour tour.  A three-hour tour.
That's not to say that the film adaptation of Sebastian Junger's
best-seller about the fate of the Andrea Gail isn't without merit.  The
effects are, at times, pretty good, and the acting is, for the most
part, solid and well-cast.  But I had problems with Storm right from the
opening credits, which are displayed over a monument to those that have
died at sea in and around Gloucester, Massachusetts, where the film
takes place.  If you didn't know the ending before you walked into the
theatre, the whole thing is ruined for you two minutes into the film.
Storm re-teams Three Kings co-stars George Clooney and Mark Wahlberg -
the former playing sword-boat skipper Billy Tyne to the latter's little
buddy named Bobby Shatford (Clooney and Wahlberg are trying to be the
Hepburn and Tracy of the new millennium).  The film opens in the fall of
1991, where Tyne and his crew have just returned from the latest in what
we learn is a long string of unsuccessful fishing expeditions.  Because
of their light load, each earns a lot less money than they had
expected.  The cash is doled out by Andrea Gail owner Bobby Brown
(Michael Ironside, The Omega Code), who is so unlikeable that they might
as well have given him an eye-patch and a peg-leg.
Believing that there's a lot of fish out there somewhere, Tyne
reassembles his reluctant crew for one last run.  Tyne guarantees them a
huge haul and tons of money, both of which he plans on accomplishing by
venturing further into the ocean than these fishermen usually go.  So
they kiss their wives/girlfriends goodbye, pack up the provisions, and
head for the Flemish Cap, which sounds like something that might be worn
in an Adam Sandler film, or perhaps a European contraceptive device.
What they encounter, of course, is the storm of the century, as Category
5 Hurricane Grace meets up with a bunch of Canadian cold fronts right on
top of the Andrea Gail.  There are two-hundred-mile-an-hour winds and
hundred-foot waves.  But if you're thinking that the film is going to be
an edge-of-your-seat adventure, you might want to show up late because
it takes well over an hour before the water even starts to get a little
bit choppy.
In addition to the monotonous waves that grow more and more tiresome,
Storm's shots are so tight on the action and so logged with water spray
that you can barely tell up from down.  Director Wolfgang Petersen (Air
Force One) and Oscar-winning cinematographer John Seale (The Talented
Mr. Ripley) don't offer much more than dark and wet.  Yes, I understand
that the real Andrea Gail was probably very dark and very wet, but that
doesn't mean that the film had to recreate the look and feel to the
point that it is here.  You might as well watch wearing a blindfold.
Although based on real people, I found the supporting roles to be little
more than typical stock characters.  There's the jaded and grizzled
captain  (Clooney), the eager young kid with an attractive girlfriend
(Wahlberg), the bitter divorced guy (John C. Reilly, Magnolia), the
rat-faced loser  (John Hawkes, Blue Streak), the down-and-out unemployed
guy (William Fichtner, Drowning Mona) and the black guy that hardly has
any screen time (Allen Payne, A Price Above Rubies).  For a while, I was
sure he'd be the first one bumped off, but the `Brother Rule' doesn't
apply to Storm.  It's also funny to think about the years and years that
Wahlberg has probably spent with a dialect coach in an attempt to cover
up his natural South Boston accent, only to drag it out of the closet
here.
Also annoying is the performance of the usually dependable Diane Lane
(My Dog Skip), who plays Shatford's girlfriend.  She probably has
underwear older than Walhberg, and she gets to toss in the time-honored
`I have a bad feeling about this trip' line before the ship sets sail.
Yeah, and you see dead people, too.  Storm also wastes a ton of time on
the fate of three other people trapped in the storm on a separate,
smaller craft and their attempted rescue by a Coast Guard helicopter.
The tug-at-your-heart score comes compliments of James Horner (Titanic),
who they must trot out for every water-themed action/drama film.
2:00 - PG-13 for language and scenes of peril

Author
Ross Anthony
In a small Massachusetts fishing village, the season comes to a close smack
dab in the middle of Sword-boat Captain Billy Tyne's slump. Again, his crew
returns from the sea with a pittance of a catch, leaving them all with a
pain in the pocket book. Taking the hit personally, Clooney (the Skipper)
decides to sail the ship out one more time after only a day and half's stay
in hopes of restocking his fish bins and confidence. The fishermen try to
balance their lives on land with the steep ocean swells. First mate Wahlberg
puts it this way, "I got a woman I can't stand to be two feet away from.
Then again, I love to fish." Captain George knows the quandary, "Son, you
got a problem."
Slow going like the fish-catching, the first half of the film is as bland as
the second half is exciting. We must first be introduced to our crew and
their loved ones (and rivals) on land before we go to sea. The perfect storm
doesn't even begin to brew until the halfway mark at which point the crew
must decide to venture into the bowels of hell or safely wait it out while
their valuable catch spoils. Of course, they go for it.
And what a storm it is! Though digitally assisted, this is one "in your
face" hurricane. Huge waves, thick soot-filled clouds, winds with the force
of an anchor slung from a chain. Clooney and Wahlberg slide all over this
water-engorged deck as the sea comes at them from every direction. The
team's turmoil is integrated with a battered 24 foot sailboat's tumult and a
coast guard helicopter rescue team as they brave the skies of bullet rain.
This high intensity action sequence will have you clutching the arms of your
seat, or the arms of the person seated next to you.
The story itself has many of the elements of the disaster film formula: the
waiting loved ones, the feuding crewmates, the slick newscaster tracking the
story. The script offers standard dialogue, just to tell the story, nothing
much to chew on. So the weaker actors don't get any help from the writers.
The most interesting character drama comprises a couple of chips shouldered
by two feuding fishermen. Reilly and Fichtner have the acting power to back
up the animosity. Despite good performance by Clooney and Wahlberg, these
rivaling crewmen give the film it's strongest character driven drama.
Quite slow from the gate to half, where it rushes like a waterfall to the
near end, it's a stirring ride, but not a must see film.
The Perfect Storm. Copyright Š 2000.
Starring George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Diane Lane, William Fichtner, Karen
Allen, Allen Payne, Bob Gunton, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio and John C.
Reilly.
Directed by Wolgang Petersen.
Written by William D. Wittliff and Bo Goldman. (Based on a true story)
Produced by Wolgang Petersen, Paula Weinstein, Gail Katz at Warner
Bros(C)2000. Rated R.
Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 2000. Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Alex Ioshpe
DIRECTED BY: Wolfgang Petersen
WRITTEN BY: William D. Wittliff (based on the book by Sebastian Junger)
CAST: George Clooney, Marc Wahlberg, Karen Allen, John C. Reilly
Disaster-movies form a genre that is probably the least respected of
all genres. It is simply the dumbest and most primitive of what
Hollywood has to offer, besides 'Godzilla' and 'Lost in Space' (who
are disasters in their own peculiar way). Lately there have been many
additions to this lowest layer of entertainment. The normal procedure
is to leave your brain at the counter and then take your place in
front of the screen. But we don't care. We love watching
disaster-movies: 'Twister', 'Volcano' ext.. We love to not
think. We've seen all kind of natural disasters: volcanoes,
earthquakes, twisters and even giant lizards in New York. But there is
one element missing: storm. This time director Wolfgang Petersen ('Das
Boot'), wants to pay with natural phenomenas, and luckily manages to
breathe some life into this godforsaken genre. The media kit for "The
Perfect Storm" begins with a special request that reads, "Warner
Brothers Pictures would appreciate the press' cooperation in not
revealing the ending of this film to their readers, viewers or
listeners." And so, following this request I will not reveal anything
specific about the premise, which is pretty simple: "In the fall of
1991 six fishermen left Gloucester, Massachusetts. And encountered a
natural disaster that has never before occurred in recorded
history. Nature has created a monster.."
It is not much of a story. And the film is mostly driven by characters
and special effects, who compete for screen time. Petersen manages to
create the right feeling, the mood, the atmosphere. And when that is
accomplished, you don't even need a story. The first we experience is
the fear and anticipation that we share with the wives, children and
parents that anxiously await the return of the fishermen, and the joy
of actually seeing them alive. Already the audience is given a peek
into the lives of these simple men, their trade and their
paradox. While their loved once are happy when they return, they feel
emptiness and longing. As much as they love their family and friends,
the deep blue sea is constantly calling for them in their
dreams. Their passion for the ocean is also their tragedy. It
alienates them from their earthly existence and the only place they
feel alive and at home is at sea. Petersen stimulates this romantic
notion of 'man versus nature' and paints the poetic contrast between
the gray, dark village and the magical blue sea. Sometimes it is
sapphire-blue, sometimes it is full of golden sparkles from bright
sundowns and pink sunrises. Sometimes it shines like liquid silver in
the reflection of the moonlight. The fresh ocean breeze, the sound of
seagulls in the morning and singing whales in the evening. It is like
a different and magical world of true peace and freedom. Captain Billy
Tyne (George Clooney) is heading towards the sunset with the fresh
breeze in his face, and his trusted vessel glides through the pure,
blue water. Now he is at home. And on his face, which has always been
sad and shy, is a smile. Tyne is probably the best developed character
in this story. He has fallen into a slump and takes his vessel out on
a desperate late-season voyage; there's a hint of Hemingway's "Old Man
and the Sea" in his character, with the wounded dignity and human
complexity. Clooney portrays him well, without making him a one
dimensional hero, but rather as a hurt and misunderstood human
being. His mos t quite, good hearted youngster, who is ripped apart
between his devotion to his loving girlfriend and the deep blue
sea. Mark Wahlberg continues to grow in confidence and ability, giving
surprising depth and shading to Bobby. The rest of his fearless crew
consists of Murph (John C. Reilly), a silent veteran who has estranged
himself from his wife and child and hides at sea, with his love and
emotions sealed inside him, Bugsy (John Hawkes) -- a sweet-natured,
but socially inept guy who has nothing to do on earth. He has nobody
that cares for him, nobody that will be glad when he returns. Sully
(William Fichtner), is the sullen adventurer and apparently Murph's
lifelong adversary. And of finally the Jamaican fishermen Alfred
Pierre (Allen Payne), who is almost never shown. He is like a shadow
on the ship, helping silently and fearlessly when the problem comes.
When the storm finally hits, the atmosphere changes. And the magical
blue waves turn into a midst of a monstrous, black fury. There is
something devilish, something unearthly about these gigantic
creations. The scale is enormous and frightening. And from this point
the film transforms from a melancholic drama to a magnificent thrill
ride. Peterson inserts some incredibly inventive shots and scenes. The
camera circles the ship, swims under water and flies through the
stormy clouds. The feeling is indescribable, an amazing adrenaline
rush, but regrettably hardly anything else. Peterson may have created
the perfect storm, but hardly a perfect film. Unfortunately the waves
have as much (if not more) screen time as the actors, who at times
seem like a background, with their character development almost
forgotten. Whether it was intentional, or whether the director was too
preoccupied with the special effects to think about his script, we
will never know. Another important element that was completely out of
place was ironically the music. Ironically because the composer is
James Horner, who created the Oscar-winning score for Titanic and
'Apollo 13'. However in 'The Perfect Storm' the good composer
completely misunderstood the director's intentions. Instead of
portraying the menace and silent horror that slowly crops up, Horner
adds a proud, patriotic fanfare, which seems completely out of place
and beyond any logic. In fact it quite often ruins the poetic
atmosphere that Peterson tries to create. The script may likewise need
some polishing and complexity. What Petersen does best is reflecting
the atmosphere, the terror and despair that these fishermen are
feeling. In this effort he achieves an incredible level of tension,
anxiety, drama and suspense. The fact that we know something about
them, make us care. We know about their families that anxiously await
them to return, about their dreams and hopes for the future. It is a
peek into a fisherman's life. Petersen tries to simultaneously tell
several parallel stories.  A raging waters and shows the situation at
home, where their families and friends sit in fear, terror and
isolation on an island surrounded by a furious blackness. And it is
here that he should stop. Instead of concentrating more on the six
fishermen and their emotional development and evolution, Petersen is
shifting his sets and characters in a terrible speed. He shows the
meteorologists, the other unfortunate sailors, fishermen and tourists
lost at sea and even the heroic rescue personnel that before saving
themselves had to save the others. This disturbing lack of
concentration is really what in the end ruins the film's otherwise
well directed drama. And yet, 'The Perfect Storm' never seems as a bad
effort. It will capture your attention like few movies have in recent
time. And unlike most disaster movies, this film feels like an amazing
adrenaline rush, a feeling that feels like a roller coaster ride. And
for that achievement alone, Petersen deserves praise.

Author
Susan Granger
Susan Granger's review of "THE PERFECT STORM" (Warner Bros.)
"More people die on fishing boats, per capita, than working in any other job in
the U.S.. Every journey a fishing boat makes can be an all-or-nothing risk. It
is life at its most exhilarating and its most terrifying," says director
Wolfgang Petersen ("Das Boot"). And that's just what he captures in this true
story of struggle and humanity aboard a swordfishing boat, the Andrea Gail,
sailing out of Gloucester, Massachusetts, in late October, 1991. Early in Bill
Wittliff's screenplay, based on Sebastian Junger's best-seller, we meet the crew
of six. The veteran captain (George Clooney) is frustrated because he can't find
fish on the Grand Banks, yet a rival skipper (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio)
brings in huge hauls. His right-hand man (Mark Walhberg) needs money to build a
new life with his girl-friend (Diane Lane). There's a devoted dad (John C.
Reilly) with an estranged wife and son, a free-spirited Jamaican (Allen Payne),
a lonely guy (John Hawkes), and a last-minute replacement with a bad attitude
(William Fichtner). The skipper's convinced he can change his bad luck streak in
remote Flemish Cap, and he does. But then trouble begins. There's a rogue wave,
a man overboard and the ice machine breaks - with 60,000 lb. of fish that could
spoil. But that's minor compared with a deadly monster storm approaching which a
Boston meteorologist describes as "a disaster of epic proportions" that also
threatens the lives of a Coast Guard helicopter rescue team trying to save three
people stranded on a sailboat on the high seas. It's formulaic and there are
cliches, but the walls of water, created by fluid dynamics simulating real-life
phenomena, are awesome. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "The Perfect
Storm" is a terrifying, suspenseful 8. Hang on for the white-knuckle thrill ride
of the summer!

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE PERFECT STORM
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Diane Lane, John C. Reilly,
William Fichtner, John Hawkes, Allen Payne, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio.
Screenplay:  Bill Wittliff, based on the book by Sebastian Junger.
Producers:  Paula Weinstein, Wolfgang Petersen and Gail Katz.
Director:  Wolfgang Petersen.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  136 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The amazing thing about Sebastian Junger's best-selling non-fiction
book THE PERFECT STORM was that it created an enthralling, page-turning
story out of two less-than-pulse-pounding subjects: fishing and weather.
Even more surprising, perhaps, was the manner in which he chose to make
those subjects readable. Rather than creating a de facto novel about the
people involved in the events, Junger dives into journalistic detail. He
immerses the reader so completely in the hard lives of swordfishermen as a
culture that it's never necessary for him to over-dramatize the individual
lives he's focusing on. As for the weather, he is similarly successful at
creating specifics out of generalities. For Junger, tension and adventure
came from the simple facts.
     Screenwriter Bill Wittliff, in adapting THE PERFECT STORM, did not
choose journalistic detail. Instead, he chose melodramatic twaddle. The
time is October 1991, and the Gloucester, Mass. swordfishing boat Andrea
Gail has just returned to port with a less-than-stellar catch, leading
Captain Billy Tyne (George Clooney) to attempt one more run before the
season ends. Fishing the Grand Banks is dangerous in the late fall, but
Tyne and his five crewmen -- including relative newcomer Bobby Shatford
(Mark Wahlberg) -- head into the tricky waters anyway. Little do they know
that a hurricane is brewing near Bermuda, and that it's heading straight
for two other East Coast weather systems. An unlikely confluence of events
finds the Andrea Gail ready to head home just as the three systems
collide, stranding them at sea in the middle of a once-in-a-century
maelstrom.
     It's not an easy job Wittliff has taken on, because there's no
obvious through-line for Junger's account to take as a screen story.
Wittliff anchors his script with the relationship between Bobby and his
loving girlfriend Christina (Diane Lane), with token attention to the
personal lives of other Andrea Gail crew members like divorced Murph (John
C. Reilly) and romantically inept Bugsy (John Hawkes). The book
effectively conveyed the personal and physical toll exacted by a
fisherman's life, and for a while it appears that Wittliff is pointing the
story in the right direction. He sets up Tyne's recent run of hard luck, a
run he fears may cost him his boat if he doesn't pull in a big haul this
time around; he sets up Bobby's conflict over whether he can give up
fishing to settle down with Christina. THE PERFECT STORM could have been
set up as a seafaring TWISTER, with stick figure characters wrapped in
cool meteorological special effects. This film, at least, has its heart in
the right place.
     Its dialogue, however, could not be more wrong, wrong, wrong. Perhaps
panicked over how to make a journalistic account "engaging" for viewers,
the makers of THE PERFECT STORM apparently gave Bill Wittliff the
following instructions for writing his characters: "Imagine a particularly
bad romance novel with a $100 million budget." The people in THE PERFECT
STORM talk to each other like no human beings on the planet have ever
spoken to each other, let alone the taciturn folk of a New England fishing
town.  They say things like, "There's only love;" they say things like,
"You're heading right into the mouth of the monster!;" a rescue jumper
screams "Jonesy!" into the storm after a fallen comrade. For all the
verisimilitude Wittliff pumps into the conversations, the fishermen might
as well have spent two hours growling "Arrgh, matey" to one another. 
     If not for the thrillingly staged final hour, THE PERFECT STORM might
have been a total loss. As it stands, it's just on the border of worth a
look. Director Wolfgang Petersen stages the Andrea Gail's perilous journey
with the kind of tension that finds you pulling yourself into a ball in
your seat; there's also a strangely effective scene involving a mid-air
refueling attempt for a rescue helicopter thwarted by the intense winds.
It's purely visceral film-making, mind you, but it's very good visceral
film-making, and at least you don't have to worry about listening to the
next ridiculous thing to come out of someone's mouth. It's ironic, because
THE PERFECT STORM had the potential to be a powerfully human story in
spite of showy visual effects and adventure set pieces. Instead, it's only
worth watching for its visual effects and adventure set pieces. The storm
itself is perfect; the purple prose journey towards that storm makes you
long for a bit more journalistic distance. Or at least for someone to
fiddle with the sound mix so the wind drowned out every word.

Author
Lars Lindahl
Reviewed by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, John C.
Reilly, Diane Lane, John Hawkes, Allen Payne, William
Fichtner, Karen Allen, Bob Gunton, Janet Wright, Rusty
Schwimmer, Dash Mihok, Michael Ironside, and Mary
Elizabeth Mastrantonio
Wolfgang Petersen's latest, The Perfect Storm, is like
a pineapple. It only tastes good after arduous peeling
and digging - if you try to eat the fruit, spikes and
all, it's going to hurtquite a bit. OK, maybe that
was a confusing analogy, so here's my main complaint
about the latest man battles nature flick: there isn't
really much of a story to tell. Basically, a
Massachusetts fishing crew goes out to sea on a small
boat, called the Andrea Gail, and gets stuck in the
middle of "the storm of the century." How much time
does it take for Petersen to tell this story? Not
nearly enough. So he spends the majority of the film
developing pointless side stories which all eventually
become superfluous. Audiences want to see the storm,
they want to see a fight for survival but what they
get is a lot of cliched, maudlin drivel. The last
quarter of The Perfect Storm is utterly perfect in
every aspect, but just try lasting the first
three-quarters. 
I have yet to read Sebastian Junger's The Perfect
Storm, but from what I have heard it is an
unforgettable tale. Based on a true story, the book
must have found some other way to introduce the
characters because in the movie version, the approach
is weak. Using a wonderfully patriotic score by James
Horner, Petersen almost hides the in-your-face
banality. Right away the central characters are
introduced: the gritty, determined captain (George
Clooney), the ingenue (Mark Wahlberg) torn between his
job and his girlfriend (Diane Lane), the loving father
(John C. Reilly), the comic relief who's always trying
to get laid (John Hawkes), the new guy (William
Fichtner) who immediately antagonizes a crewmate and
the quiet, French guy (Allen Payne). So many problems
strike the opening segment of the film that the
remaining portions directly suffer. It is not the
all-star cast's fault, just the characters designed
for their portrayal. Allen Payne's character never
speaks in the entire movie, not because he is mute,
but because he's never given any lines! Are we
supposed to root for a guy whose face and voice we are
never given a chance to interact with? Fichtner's
character is terribly underdeveloped - we don't know
what he's doing there, where he's from, or who he's
supposed to be. The remaining four fishermen are all
cardboard stereotypes (Hawkes says to a female
stranger in one scene "You know what would look good
on you? Me!" Ooooh real creative).
As the script advances and the Andrea Gail floats
farther out into the waters, the crew continues to not
feel human. Only when the storm takes center stage
does the movie jump out of its sleepwalk. The
computer-generated images of gigantic waves crashing
against a helpless boat are thunderously real. I can
only imagine if this was an IMAX film, this city kid
would surely never go in the water again. This is
loud, jolting entertainment - adjectives that
completely negate the rest of the film. 
The Perfect Storm was unfortunately a disappointment.
The maelstrom lived up to its potential but everything
else failed to do so. I guess I'll stick to that other
Survival spectacleyou know the one on CBS?

Author
Steve Kong
I affectionately call The Perfect Storm "The Perfect Snore." It's hard to 
find a movie like The Perfect Storm. It is a movie with all the makings of 
a perfect movie, but somehow it fails miserably.
In October 1991, a storm like no other kicked up in the Atlantic. Trapped 
in this storm is the boat Andrea Gail, onboard the ship is a crew of grubby 
looking men and a million odd dollars of swordfish. It's hard to say what 
bothered me about this film, since it will spoil the film, but it rests 
completely on the reliability of the story.
The first half of the film deals with meeting the crew of the Andrea Gail 
and the people around them. Meet captain Billy Tyne (George Clooney), Bobby 
Shatford (Mark Wahlberg), Dale Murphy (John C. Reilly), David Sullivan 
(William Fichtner), Bugsy Moran (John Hawkes), and Alfred Pierre (Allen 
Payne). Now that you've met the crew, meet their wives, girlfriends, and 
women they meet at the local pub. Got all of those characters down? Now 
meet the captain of the other boat, Linda Greenland (Mary Elizabeth 
Mastrantonio); the owner of the company that owns both boats, the evil Bob 
Brown (Michael Ironside); a weather forecaster who seems to get too excited 
by storms, Todd Gross (Christopher McDonald); the crew of a sailboat also 
trapped in the storm; the crew of a Coast Guard ship out to rescue 
everyone; and finally the crew of a helicopter that never seems to go down. 
Now, after an hour of watching, you have all those people in mind. What 
should you do? Throw out all of them, except the crew of the Andrea Gail - 
the others, though used throughout the film, are mostly fluff.
The second half of the film focuses on the storm. Instead of focusing on 
how the storm and the impending gloom of death are affecting the crew, 
director Wolfgang Peterson focuses on "high five moments." One after 
another, we get scenes in which a crewmember's life is put into danger. 
But, miraculously they are saved and after this miracle, all around the 
boat are high fives and cheering. After the first two, this started getting 
old.
The special effects employed in the film are a mixed bag. Some are 
incredible (seeing a little fishing boat crawling up the face of a 
multi-storied high wave is incredible) but some are just incredulous (the 
whole helicopter routine, with some funny physics to go with it, was 
laughable).
On the acting front, everyone does what they can given the amount of 
characters in the film - and the limited amount of lines each actor has. 
Clooney, who I like a lot, is believable as the captain of the doomed ship. 
Wahlberg is, well, Mark Wahlberg again. Wahlberg doesn't seem to have a 
wide range of acting skills, and though he does what he does well, I'm 
still not impressed with him as an actor. The other actors, well, they're 
all a blur. John C. Reilly and William Fichtner are put into many more 
catfights than needed. Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio is put into the "return 
home safely dear" role. And Diane Lane, who plays Wahlberg's wife, doesn't 
get more that what Mastrantonio gets.
My disappointment comes from seeing a cast and crew of such potential in 
such a mediocre film. First, director Wolfgang Peterson is a 
disappointment. He put together such tense and interesting films as Das 
Boot and In The Line of Fire, why couldn't he have injected some of that 
intenseness into this bland and tedious film? Second, although there is a 
fine cast onboard, there are so many characters in the script that the duty 
of each actor gets diluted. Had the film concentrated on just the crew of 
the Andrea Gail and their emotional state, it would have been an intense 
film. And lastly, the special effects by ILM are disappointing - with 
quality wavering all over the place.
The Perfect Storm can be summed up by a laughable scene with Mark Wahlberg. 
Wahlberg is floating in the sea, bobbing up and down in slow motion, he is 
doing a voice-over, and superimposed on the screen with him is Diane Lane 
smiling and waving. The silliness of this scene, when one sees it, is the 
exclamation point to a dull film. Should you see this film? Sure, if you 
have extra time, if it is a matinee showing, and most importantly, if 
you've had a good night's sleep. There's nothing even close to perfect 
about The Perfect Storm.
